District of Columbia statutes.
47-136

Restoration of lapsed appropriations.

The Secretary of the Treasury is authorized to restore from lapsed appropriations amounts certified by the Mayor of the District of Columbia, or his designated representatives, as being necessary for the payment of audited claims under such appropriations.

History

Aug. 6, 1958, 72 Stat. 512, Pub. L. 85-594, § 14
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-136.
1973 Ed., § 47-138.